'Domestic demand is now expected to make no contribution to Australian economic growth in fiscal 1986/87, ending June 30, while net exports will account for all of the overall increase, Treasurer Paul Keating said here.     However, he did not say in his speech to the Economic Planning Advisory Council (EPAC) if the forecast 2.25 pct rise in gross domestic product (gdp) had been revised.     But Keating said domestic demand could fall slightly this financial year and net export growth will provide the total source of gdp growth.     The August budget had forecast domestic demand would contribute 0.75 percentage points to non-farm gdp growth of 2.5 pct while net exports would account for 1.75 points.     Keating said the overall impact of the changed economic parameters is welcome as it appears to have contributed to a slightly more rapid correction in the current account deficit than first anticipated.     \"The government initially forecast a current account deficit for 1986/87 of 14.75 billion -- our present expectation is that the result will be somewhat lower, around 14 billion,\" he said.     Partial indicators released since the last meeting of EPAC in December indicate that the 1986/87 budget strategy is broadly on track, Keating said.     \"They indicate that domestic demand has been a little more sluggish than was expected at budget time,\" he said.     \"On the other hand, net exports seem to be expanding by more than expected at budget time, and this is underpinning growth in domestic production and employment.\"     Keating said it now seems likely that the 1986/87 inflation rate will exceed the budget forecast of eight pct.     \"Nevertheless, there is likely to be a marked slowing in inflation over coming quarters as depreciation and budgetary effects wane,\" he said.     Keating said the government expects economic growth to pick up moderately in 1987/88 due to a further significant rise in net exports and a very moderate but positive contribution from private domestic demand.     He said domestic demand growth will be due to a strengthening in real household disposable income.     The moderate rise in economic growth next financial year should be sufficient to sustain employment growth at a level broadly equivalent to that of the current fiscal year.     \"The current account deficit will continue to show improvement in 1987/88,\" Keating said.     \"As the impact of the exchange rate depreciations of recent years recede further, and given continued effective wage restraint, inflation should moderate markedly in 1987/88,\" he said.  \n',gnp
'Australia\'s seasonally adjusted real gross domestic product (GDP) rose 1.1 pct in the fourth quarter of 1986 after rising 0.2 pct in the third quarter, the Statistics Bureau said.     This compares with a 1.1 pct fall in the fourth quarter of 1985.     Compared with the year-earlier quarter, GDP also rose 1.1 pct, the Bureau figures show.     The annual rise compares with a 0.3 pct fall in the third quarter compared with the 1985 third quarter and a 4.3 pct rise in the year-earlier period, the Bureau figures show.     Real non-farm gross product rose 0.9 pct in the fourth quarter after zero growth in the third quarter and a 1.3 pct fall a year earlier, making an annual rise of 0.8 pct.     Gross farm product rose 4.3 pct compared with rises of 2.6 pct in the third quarter and 2.8 pct a year earlier, making annual growth of 6.6 pct.     Elements in the fourth quarter GDP rise included falls of 0.6 pct and 0.2 pct in private and government final consumption expenditure respectively, the Bureau figures show.     Gross fixed capital expenditure fell 0.1 pct in the quarter while exports of goods and services rose 13.0 pct and imports 2.9 pct.     Seasonally-adjusted expenditure on GDP at average 1979/80 prices rose to 36.67 billion dlrs in the fourth quarter from 36.26 billion in both the third quarter and the year-earlier quarter.     The figures are subject to revision over a long period.  \n',gnp
'A meeting of leading politicians, bankers and economists has forecast Austrian real gross domestic product growth for this year at between 0.5 and 1.5 pct, a government spokesman said.     This compared with a two pct growth forecast made by the semi-official Institute for Economic Research (WIFO) last December.     Helmut Kramer, spokesman for Chancellor Franz Vranitzky, tolds that the forecast had been made during the meeting attended by Vranitzky, Finance Minister Ferdinand Lacina, National Bank President Stefan Koren and a WIFO representative.     Economists have been cutting growth forecasts recently mainly due to expectations of a poor export performance this year, notably to Eastern Europe and oil exporting states.     Hannes Androsch, general director of Creditanstalt-Bankverein CABV.VI, today put 1987 GDP growth at between one and 1.5 pct.     Kramer also said the meeting had heard that unemployment for the year would be above the 5.5 pct forecast, but was unlikely to be more than six pct.  \n',gnp
'French 1987 growth will probably be about two pct, the same as last year, due to an international environment that is less favourable than expected, Finance Minister Edouard Balladur was quoted as saying.     Treasury director Daniel Lebegue said last month that gross domestic product is expected to grow by between two and 2.5 pct this year, against an original target of 2.8 pct.     Although in line with the latest Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD) estimate of 2.1 pct growth, the forecast will be balanced by growth in investments and exports, Balladur said in an interview with the daily Les Echos.     Last month Balladur said French GDP had grown by just two pct last year, compared with an initial 1986 target of 2.5 pct and 1.1 pct growth in 1985.     He told Les Echos he aims to reduce the 1988 budget deficit to 115 billion francs from this year\'s figure of 129 billion and compared with a 141 billion deficit in 1985.     He has already announced his intention of cutting the deficit to 100 billion francs in 1989.  \n',gnp
'Gross domestic product is expected to grow by 4.4 pct in the year ending June 30, Finance Minister Mohammad Syeduzzaman told reporters.     Inflation fell to an estimated 12 pct this fiscal year from 17 pct in 1981/82, he said last night.     The World Bank and other independent sources have said inflation would be around 15 pct in 1986/87.     Syeduzzaman said remittances from expatriates would rise to 600 mln dlrs this year from 425 mln in 1981/82.     Foreign exchange reserves at end-June are projected at 680 mln dlrs compared with 105 mln in 1981/82, he said.     Syeduzzaman said the export target has been set at 900 mln dlrs this year against 626 mln in 1981/82. Commitments for foreign loans and grants total more than five billion dlrs in 1986/87, against 3.54 billion five years previously, he said.     The government\'s liberal industrial policy has attracted investment commitments totalling 250 mln dlrs, he said     Foodgrain output is estimated at 16.4 mln tonnes this year, up from 16.12 mln in 1985/86 and 14.4 mln in 1981/82.     Government officials have said Bangladesh must import nearly two mln tonnes of grain annually up to 1990, when the government expects to attain self-sufficiency in food.  \n',gnp
'External risks for the economy have increased, but growth of two to 2.5 pct this year is still possible, according to President of the West German Federation of Banks, Hanns Christian Schroeder-Hohenwarth.     Schroeder-Hohenwarth told a news conference the further fall of the dollar since the start of this year and the revaluation of the mark against European currencies meant West German exporters were facing a \"rough wind.\"     However, domestic demand was continuing to rise and private consumption in particular would support the economy, he said. He saw good prospects for consumer industries.     Schroeder-Hohenwarth said economic policy now had to concentrate on strengthening this domestic growth. In this context, he welcomed a decision by the government to increase the scope of tax cuts due in 1988.     He added, a planned reform of the fiscal system scheduled for 1990, which was worked out by coalition partners this month, was an \"important step in the right direction.\"     The government plans to cut corporation tax to 50 pct from 56 pct. However, Schroeder-Hohenwarth said the decision to cut the maximum rate of income tax to only 53 pct from 56 pct was \"rather half-hearted.\"  \n',gnp
'An internal report produced by the Belgian National Bank foresees the country\'s gross national product growth falling in 1987 to 1.0 pct from 2.3 pct in 1986, the independent newspaper Le Soir said.     A National Bank spokesman said the newspaper article was basically correct, but that the report was produced six weeks ago and figures were therefore to some extent out of date.     The government\'s planning bureau predicted growth of 0.9 pct this year in a study published last month.  \n',gnp
'Belgian Prime Minister Wilfried Martens announced to Parliament a plan to reduce the 1987 government financing requirement by 20.6 billion francs.     He said this will enable the requirement to be held to 419.7 billion francs, against the previous government target of 417.8 billion, or eight pct of gross national product.     Martens said following a lowering of government estimates of 1987 nominal GNP growth and a re-estimation by government departments of 1987 spending, the government calculated that unless action was taken, the requirement would exceed the target by 22.5 billion francs.     Martens said the plan involved raising non-fiscal receipts by 5.8 billion francs and reducing spending by 14.3 billion. The remaining 0.5 billion francs will be raised through treasury operations.     Martens said the money is being found through a series of small economies and confirmed that it includes the raising of two billion francs through the sale of part of the government\'s 50 pct holding in the gas company Distrigaz.     Last year, the government announced a major program designed to cut 1987 spending by 195 billion francs.     The program was designed to get Belgium out of what the government said was a \"snowball effect\" under which the government constantly borrowed more to finance budget deficits which were due largely to the cost of servicing and repaying existing debt.     In 1986, the government financing requirement is estimated at 561 billion francs or 11.0 pct of GNP.  \n',gnp
'The Belgian government has lowered its forecast for the nominal increase in gross national product in 1987 to 3.5 pct from an originally forecast 3.9 pct, Prime Minister Wilfried Martens said in a statement to parliament.     He said this revision, which brings government forecasts more closely into line with those by private institutions, takes account of an anticipated slowdown in the world economy and international trade.     But he said the impact on the Belgian economy will be limited due to recent agreements on wages and working conditions agreed by employers and unions.     Martens did not say how much the government expected GNP to grow in volume terms.     However, last month the government\'s Planning Bureau said it had revised its 1987 forecast for this to 0.9 pct from 2.0 pct.     In 1986, Belgium\'s gross national product rose 2.15 pct in volume terms against a 5.9 pct nominal rise.  \n',gnp
'Bolivia is to make a formal offer during the next few months to buy back its 900 mln dlrs debt from commercial banks at a discount of up to 90 pct, central bank president Jier Nogales said.      Nogales tolds in an interview the steering committee of Bolivia\'s creditor banks had agreed to consider the offer at a meeting in New York last month.      He said the offer would be based on the value of Bolivian paper on the international secondary debt market, where it now trades at between 10 and 15 pct of its face value.     Nogales said Bolivia will make a single offer to buy back its commercial debt and banks who accepted would be paid the discounted rate in full.     Banks which declined the offer would be repaid over 20 to 30 years at interest rates below those fixed in the international markets, he added.     Bolivia has frozen payments on medium and long term loans to commercial banks since March, 1984, and Nogales said there would be no money available to restart traditional debt servicing to them for some time.      Several Latin American countries have initiated schemes to cancel foreign debt by equity swaps or third party buy-backs, but Bolivia would be the first country in the region to make a formal offer to buy back all its commercial bank debt at discounted rates.     Nogales said practical and strategic considerations would determine the exact timing of the offer but it would be made in the next few months.      He said Bolivia would not bargain with creditor banks over the price to paid for the debt paper they hold, and would make a single non-negotiable offer.     He said Bolivia could not even pay interest to friendly creditor countries, let alone commercial banks. The only traditional way forward was to capitalise interest, which would mean greater bank exposure in Bolivia and greater loss provisions, he added.     \"We are confident that the banks are going to be reasonable,\" Nogales said. \"Now they can resolve their problems for once and for all.\"     \"The most conservative ones who want a little more will wait a year, but I don\'t know if the window of opportunity will be open all the time,\" he added.     Discussing the status of other parts of Bolivia\'s four billion dlr foreign debt, 2.5 billion of which is owed to governments and the rest to international agencies, Nogales said negotiators had achieved considerable success in recent discussions with the Paris Club.      He said Paris Club creditors had agreed to reschedule Bolivian debt over 10 years with five to six years grace, while accepting that interest would not be paid until 1989. Interest rates were being discussed on a bilateral basis under Paris Club rules, he added.      He said some Paris Club members had agreed to disregard penalty interest payments and negotiations were continuing with Argentina and Brazil, who hold 700 mln dlrs of Bolivian debt.     He said Bolivia was continuing to service loans from international agencies, and it expected to receive up to 400 mln dlrs in disbursements this year.     The capital flow for loans and their servicing had changed from a negative balance of 250 mln dlrs in 1985 to a net inflow of 130 mln dlrs last year, he added.     Nogales said that Bolivia\'s net international reserves now stood at around 250 mln dlrs, compared to one mln dlrs in disposable funds when the government of Victor Paz Estenssoro took office in August, 1985.     Nogales said inflation, which soared to over 20,000 pct a year in the government\'s first month in office, was now down to 10 pct on an annualised basis from the last six months, and the plan was that it should continue at this level.     He said the government was also expecting at least three pct growth in gdp this year after several years of negative rates.  \n',gnp
'Brazil\'s Gross Domestic Product, GDP, rose by 8.2 pct in real terms last year following an 8.3 pct increase in 1985, the Geography and Statistics Institute said.     In money terms this equalled 3.6 trillion Cruzados, giving per capita GDP of 26,120 Cruzados, or 1.6 pct above the level achieved in 1980 before the recession of 1981-1983, the Institute said in a statement.     Agricultural output, hit by adverse weather, fell by 7.3 pct last year led by coffee production which was 46 pct down.     Industry grew 12.1 pct, including capital goods by 21.6 pct and consumer goods by 20.3 pct, while services were up 8.3 pct.  \n',gnp
'Bank of Canada Governor John Crow said he expects the Canadian economy will grow moderately in the coming year, despite the near flat growth in the final quarter of 1986.     \"We see moderate growth,\" Crow told a news conference following presentation of the central bank\'s annual report in the House of Commons today.     He said there were positive signs of growth in the economy, particularly the drawdown of business inventories in the fourth quarter. Yesterday, Statistics Canada reported gross domestic product expanded a slight 0.2 pct in the quarter.     Crow reiterated the bank\'s previous statements that inflation remains a major priority in setting monetary policy and said only zero inflation would be acceptable. Canada\'s inflation rate is currently hovering around the four pct mark.     The governor said Canada\'s banking system remains sound despite recent concern about exposure by the country\'s banks in debt plagued countries such as Brazil.     \"It (the debt problem) is not a happy development but I think it can be overplayed in terms of its impact,\" Crow told reporters.  \n',gnp
'Canada\'s gross domestic product, by industry, rose a seasonally adjusted 1.2 pct in December, the largest monthly gain since April, 1986, Statistics Canada said.     GDP, which fell 0.2 pct in November, was 2.1 pct above the December, 1985 level, the federal agency said.     Output of goods producing industries rose 1.6 pct in the month, with virtually all the growth occurring in manufacturing and mining. Services producing industries expanded 1.0 pct.  \n',gnp
'Canadian economic growth is expected to slow further in 1987, but an improved the trade picture should keep the country from recession, economists said.     \"The economy is ready for about a 2.0 pct rate of growth over the course of 1987,\" said Carl Beigie, Chief Economist at Dominion Securities Pitfield Ltd.     Statistics Canada reported that gross domestic product, grew 3.1 pct in 1986, the fourth year of continuous expansion, but down from 1985\'s four pct.     In the final quarter, GDP, in 1981 prices and at annualized rates, rose a slight 0.2 pct after expanding 0.8 pct in the third quarter.     \"Essentially it is a flat performance,\" said Warren Jestin, deputy chief economist at the Bank of Nova Scotia.     Economist Wendy Smith Cork of the brokerage Nesbitt Thomson Bongard Inc said \"it shows the economy is not moving along very steadily, it\'s not a very promising number.\"     \"We weren\'t surprised, we expected to see one bad quarter in Canada, but we don\'t think there will be a recession,\" she added.     The rise in GDP was below the 3.3 pct increase forecast by Federal Finance Minister Michael Wilson in his budget last month. He also projected the economy would expand  2.8 pct this year.     Many economists are less optimistic, predicting growth will likely be in the 2.0 to 2.2 pct range.     Statistics Canada also reported the country\'s trade performance deteriorated sharply last year as the deficit in the current account rose to a record 8.8 billion Canadian dlrs from the previous year\'s shortfall of 584 mln dlrs.     \"The sharp increase in the deficit originated from merchandise trade transactions where imports continued to advance strongly whereas exports were virtually unchanged,\" the federal agency said in a statement.     The merchandise trade surplus was pared to 10.13 billion dlrs in 1986 from 17.48 billion dlrs in 1985.     But economist Cork said the expected upturn in the U.S. economy will lead to increased demand for Canadian goods, and help fuel the country\'s modest expansion. Nearly 80 pct of Canada\'s exports are shipped to the U.S. each year.  \n',gnp
'Canada\'s real gross domestic product, seasonally adjusted, rose 1.1 pct in the fourth quarter of 1986, the same as the growth as in the previous quarter, Statistics Canada said.     That left growth for the full year at 3.1 pct, which is down from 1985\'s four pct increase.     The rise was also slightly below the 3.3 pct growth rate Finance Minister Michael Wilson predicted for 1986 in February\'s budget. He also forecast GDP would rise 2.8 pct in 1987.     Statistics Canada said final domestic demand rose 0.6 pct in the final three months of the year after a 1.0 pct gain in the third quarter.     Business investment in plant and equipment rose 0.8 pct in the fourth quarter, partly reversing the cumulative drop of 5.8 pct in the two previous quarters.  \n',gnp
'Canada\'s gross domestic product rose 0.1 pct, seasonally adjusted, in January after gaining 1.0 pct in December but falling 0.1 pct and 0.3 pct in November and October, Statistics Canada said.     January\'s rise, in 1981 prices, was fueled largely by a 0.5 pct gain in the goods producing sector. Output in services-producing industries declined 0.1 pct from December\'s level.     January\'s level was 1.29 pct higher than the same month a year ago.     The federal agency said it was the second straight gain for goods producing industries. Most of the growth occurred in manufacturing and construction.     Within manufacturing, strong gains were posted in the wood, machinery, non-metallic mineral and food product groups. Significant declines were recorded in the output of automobiles and parts, however.     In the services sector, increases in finance, insurance and communication were more than offset by declines in transportation, storage and the retail trade.  \n',gnp
'chile\'s gross domestic product rose 5.7 pct last year to 18.8 billion dollars, compared to a 2.4 pct rise in the previous year, the central bank said.     It said initial projections were for a 4.6 pct increase in gdp this year.     The sectors which registered the greatest growth in 1986 were fisheries with 10 pct, agriculture at 8.7 pct, transport and communications with 8.1 pct and industry at 8.0 pct, the bank added.  \n',gnp
'Austrian gross domestic product growth for this year is likely to be between 0.5 and 1.5 pct, Helmut Kramer, head of the semi-official Institute for Economic Research (WIFO) said.     This compared with a two pct growth forecast made by the WIFO last December.     Kramer made the forecast at a meeting today on Austria\'s economic outlook also attended by Chancellor Franz Vranitzky, Finance Minister Ferdinand Lacina and National Bank President Stefan Koren.  \n',gnp
'Leaks of a major Dutch official economic forecast due to be published on Monday indicate reduced economic growth and a renewed rise in unemployment this year, political and market sources say.     Concern over an anticipated fall in Dutch competitiveness this year against a background of an average 2-1/2 pct wage increase, zero inflation and a firm guilder has triggered some calls for a change in monetary policy to help boost growth.     But whatever the government\'s response, the central bank will stick to its policy of keeping the guilder firm, they say.     The official forecasting agency Centraal Planbureau (CPB) publishes its 1987 outlook at the start of a week which will also see a key parliamentary debate on government finances and the economy.     Merchant bank Pierson, Heldring en Pierson - in an estimate reflecting general sentiment - said last month that Dutch economic growth was now seen around one pct.     Domestic consumer spending is not expected to offset the decline in export growth caused by slowing growth in West Germany, the main Dutch trading partner, and the lower dollar, Pierson said in its February economic outlook.     The latest growth forecasts are well below a 1.5 to two pct growth figure seen by the CPB early last month and forecasts of 2.5 pct economic growth in 1987 made last September.     The fall in unemployment is bottoming out and the government has already admitted it will not meet its goal of reducing unemployment by an annual 50,000 from 1986 to 1990.     Some analysts and industry leaders have questioned central bank policy of pegging the guilder firmly to the mark and if necessary keeping interest rates up to support the guilder.     Employers federation NCW chairman Fred Lempers criticised the guilder\'s revaluation in line with the West German mark in last January\'s European Monetary System (EMS) realignment and expressed concern over its effect on competitiveness.     But the employers federation VNO noted the Dutch economy had become more competitive since 1980 and the fall of the dollar was affecting this gain more than the EMS realignment.     Some analysts also question the central bank\'s decision not to copy the latest Bundesbank discount rate cut and instead lower money market rates and abolish a credit quota surcharge.     Central bank president Wim Duisenberg has defended the move saying the bank had adjusted the rates with the most impact on the money market, noting \"the (4.5 pct) discount rate is at the moment not the most important Dutch rate because it is already far below the market rates.\"     Central bank officials say the heavy dependence on trade of the Dutch economy requires a stable exchange rate, and interest rate policies serve that goal.     Analysts noted a large capital outflow from the Netherlands recently as foreign investments in Dutch stock are being sold to take profits.     Loosening the tie between the guilder and the mark would reduce international confidence in the guilder and make it more dificult to attract foreign capital, they said, noting Dutch interest rates rose sharply when the guilder was not revalued completely in line with the mark in a 1983 EMS realignment.     Many Dutch banks have reacted favourably to the decision not to copy the last German discount rate cut, but Pierson warned it could actually add to uncertainty over the guilder.     Some analysts noted friction between the Finance Ministry and the central bank, with Finance Minister Onno Ruding having said before the Bundesbank discount rate cut he favoured lower Dutch rates but that the Germans should move first.     One analyst said Ruding wanted to bring interest rates down to reduce the government debt burden.     A Finance Ministry spokesman said lower interest rates were needed but denied any suggestion of conflicting views between the ministry and the central bank. \"The cabinet\'s policy is steady, the guilder has to stay with the mark,\" he said.  \n',gnp
'Dutch economic growth is slowing as a firming guilder cuts competitiveness abroad and industries reduce the pace of investment, the Dutch official planning agency CPB said.     The Centraal Planbureau, publishing its 1987 economic outlook, said Dutch Net National Income (NNI) was expected to grow by one pct this year, down from two pct growth recorded in 1986 and 2.5 pct in 1985 and 1984.     Dutch Gross National Product is expected to rise to 432.20 billion guilders in 1987 in constant prices, a two pct increase from last year\'s 423.95 billion.     The CPB, forecasting an 8.5 pct increase in the value of the guilder on a trade-weighted basis compared with 10.0 pct last year, said the dollar was expected to trade at an average of 2.0 guilders in 1987 compared with 2.45 guilders in 1986.     \"The higher guilder is causing a substantial fall in unit labour costs abroad, when measured in guilder terms, while these are rising slightly in the Netherlands,\" the CPB said.     More of economic growth now depended on domestic consumption, the CPB said, but noting that higher margins set by domestic producers and importers mitigated the effect on purchasing power of lower import costs and deflation.     Consumer prices were set to fall by 1.5 pct this year, the CPB said. Inflation was zero last year.     Gross investment in industry was expected to grow by five pct this year, a slowdown compared with 11.5 pct growth last year, the CPB said.     Exchange rate and oil price fluctuations will continue to condition the Dutch economy in the future as it has in recent years, the CPB said, noting a continued depressing impact of these factors on Dutch competitiveness.     In addition, it noted a slight rise in taxation and social security costs to employers.     The CPB, forecasting a rise in the budget deficit to 7.2 pct of Net National Income in 1987 from 6.3 pct last year, urged the government to cut expenditure further to bring down the deficit and reduce tax and social security payments in future.     Dutch government revenue is being depressed further by falling income from natural gas sales in 1987, the CPB said.     It said unemployment was expected to fall to 675,000 this year from 710,000 last year.     While the two pct GDP growth forecast set by the CPB is within its latest forecast, issued last month, of 1.5 to two pct growth, the figure is well above recent market estimates.     Dutch merchant bank Pierson, Heldring en Pierson said in its February economic outlook that GDP growth at constant prices was expected to be 1.1 pct this year and market analysts had expected the CPB\'s final forecast to be below its own latest estimate.     \"It is too early to comment because I haven\'t seen the whole document yet, but it would seem we are more pessimistic in some of our estimates,\" a Pierson economist said.     The CPB forecast 2.5 pct export growth in volume terms in 1987, after four pct growth last year. Excluding energy exports, the 1987 figure would be two pct, it said.     Imports were set to rise by 4.5 pct this year compared with four pct in 1986 in volume terms, the CPB said.     The balance of payments would see a sharp decline in the surplus, to six billion guilders in 1987 compared with 12.1 billion last year, the CPB forecast.  \n',gnp
'The Institute for Economic Research (WIFO) said it has cut its forecast for Austria\'s 1987 gross domestic product growth to a real one pct from a two pct forecast made last December.     WIFO chief Helmut Kramer told a new conference that he saw the one pct figure, which compares with 1.8 pct last year, as the upper limit of growth. The institute had made the revision due to poor prospects for Austrian exports, he added.     A collapse in sales to the Eastern European and oil producing states, combined with the effects of the dollar\'s fall, mean exports overall are unlikely to rise this year.     Kramer said domestic demand alone would fuel growth this year. After last year\'s 2.8 pct rise in real incomes, private consumption was likely to rise 2.25 pct in 1987 after 1.9 pct in 1986, despite a present trend towards higher savings.     Unemployment was likely to rise to almost six pct from 5.2 pct last year due to the slack economic activity.     Kramer said the current account was likely to run a deficit of about four billion schillings compared with a 2.6 billion surplus recorded last year. The National Bank, Austria\'s central bank, last month forecast the current account would be roughly in balance this year.     However, Kramer said the lower economic growth should have no notable effect on the government\'s attempts to cut the budget deficit. This year\'s aim of reducing the deficit to 4.9 pct of GDP from 5.1 pct in 1986 could still be achieved, he said.  \n',gnp
'The Japanese economy will remain sluggish in the months ahead after turning in its worst performance for 12 years in 1986, private economists said.     Consumer spending, a main driving force of domestic demand, was likely to remain lacklustre although brisk housing and business investment would help sustain the economy this year, the economists said.     They said they were shocked by an Economic Planning Agency report today that private spending fell 0.7 pct in the Oct/Dec quarter for the first time in 12 years.     The report said Japan\'s gross national product rose a real 0.8 pct in Oct/Dec after a revised 0.7 pct increase in the previous quarter.     It said GNP growth for 1986 was a real 2.5 pct, down from 4.7 pct in 1985. Agency officials said this was the worst performance since 1974 when GNP contracted 1.4 pct in the wake of the first oil crisis.     They expressed concern about the 0.7 pct decline in consumer spending in the final quarter of 1986 but said it was only temporary as exceptionally warm winter weather had depressed retail sales.     But most private economists disagreed and said consumers were likely to remain pessimistic in coming months as they saw their real income level off.     \"Sure, consumers may have spent less on winter clothes or heating apparatus because of the warm winter this year, but they have done so because they have become even more uneasy about their future pay rises,\" said Shoji Saito, general manager of Mitsui Bank\'s economic research division.     He said the outlook for pay increases was gloomy because of  falling employment in many industries, particularly those hit hard by the yen\'s rise.     Masao Suzaki, senior economist at the Bank of Tokyo, said weakened consumer confidence was the most worrying factor. Without brisk consumer spending, Japan can hardly achieve domestically generated economic growth as the government has put a lid on fiscal measures, he said.     Other economists said the 0.8 pct growth registered in Oct/Dec may have been inflated by special factors, including exceptionally heavy spending in the public sector. Johsen Takahashi, chief economist at Mitsubishi Research Institute, said the 14.4 pct increase in public sector spending in Oct/Dec resulted from an issue of gold coins.     \"This is just a one-shot spending and we can\'t expect that high level of public-sector consumption in the following quarter,\" Takahashi said. Agency officials said public spending would have risen 1.1 pct in Oct/Dec without the issue, which marked 60 years of Emperor Hirohito\'s reign.     Takahashi said the economy might contract in the current quarter given the lack of additional significant government spending and sluggish consumer spending.     Saito said the most effective government action would be income tax cuts and the postponement beyond next January of a proposed controversial sales tax.  \n',gnp
'This year will see a pickup in U.S. economic growth and inflation, the Shadow Open Market Committee said in its semi-annual policy statement.     The SOMC, a group of basically \"monetarist\" private economists, said that \"economic growth will accelerate in 1987 in response to powerful stimulative actions by the Federal Reserve.\"     The group said the Fed\'s actions have been excessive. As a result, it said that \"inflation and ultimately another recession now loom on the horizon.\"     The SOMC said that central bank policies that rely on progressively larger swings in monetary expansion will not lead to sustainable economic growth and stable prices.     The group made no specific nominal forecasts of economic or inflation growth in its policy statement. However, the Committee at its Sunday policy-making meeting said it was basically in accord with projections by Jerry Jordan, who is a member of the SOMC and economist at First Interestate Bancorp.     Jordan expects real GNP growth to be about one percentage point higher than in the past two years. He expects consumer prices to rise about 4-1/2 pct this year.     The SOMC said in recent months rapid money growth has been a principal cause of the devaluation. To avoid another costly inflation and disinflation, the SOMC urged the Fed to \"abandon its inflationary policy and set the growth rate of the monetary base on the path toward sustained lower inflation.\"     The Fed in February said it would no longer target the narrow M-1 money supply because the link between M-1 and economic growth has been largely severed.  \n',gnp
'Federal Reserve Board Vice Chairman Manuel Johnson said that maintaining price stability was critical to achieving non-inflationary economic growth in the world and said that progress was being made.     \"It is worth reiterating that the Federal Reserve\'s promotion of price stability is critical to the successful implementation of virtually all of the important ingredients for growth,\" he told the Eastern Economic Association.     Johnson said initial progress has been made on a variety of fronts. \"Federal Reserve monetary policy, the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings legislation, the G-6 agreement, and the Baker debt initiative for example all have moved us in the right direction,\" he said. G-6 is comprised of U.S., Britain, France, Japan, West Germany and Canada.     On the budget deficit, Johnson said meeting precise numerical goals was less important than a continuing commitment toward slowing the growth of federal spending.     There was evidence deficits as a pct of Gross National Product were declining and would continue to drop, he said.     But Johnson warned against reliance on inflow of foreign capital to finance investment and the budget deficit and keep interest rates stable.     \"This situation, however, cannot continue indefinitely. Sooner or later progress must be made in controlling excessive federal spending,\" he said.     A disinflationary monetary policy should continue to be the main objective of the Fed, Johnson said.     He also said a more stable and sustainable alignment of exchange rates was needed for long-term growth.     On the trade deficit, Johnson warned against \"quick fix\" solutions, which he identified as excessive dollar depreciation or protectionist trade legislation.     \"What is important is that we attempt to maintain healthy returns to capital and adopt policies encouraging genuine economic growth,\" he said.     Such an approach would finance the trade deficit but allow for its gradual resolution over time.  \n',gnp
'Finland\'s gross national product is expected to rise by three pct in 1987 against two pct in 1986 and inflation will be unchanged at about 3.5 pct, the private business survey office ETLA predicted.     Unemployment in 1987 is put at 5.5 pct, in line with last year, the office predicted in its regular review.     The balance of payments would show a five billion markka deficit in 1987, against a 4.2 billion deficit in 1986.  \n',gnp
'French industry is failing to produce the goods its markets need and its loss of competitiveness has left the government little room for manoeuvre to reflate the economy, the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development said.     With gross domestic product likely to grow only 2.1 pct this year, the same rate as last year, unemployment could climb to 11.5 pct of the workforce by mid-1988, from its present 10.9 pct, it said in an annual review of the French economy.     The report said the French economy was \"increasingly ill-adapted to demand\" selling goods at \"uncompetitive relative prices on both domestic and export markets.\"     \"France\'s poor export performance reflects a geographical bias in favour of markets less dynamic than the average... And...A substantial loss of market share...In the past 18 months,\" it said.     Pointing to a likely widening of the French trade deficit to around 2.9 billion dlrs this year from 2.4 billion in 1986, it warned that a further depreciation of the dollar against the franc could lead to \"a (renewed) loss of competitiveness relative not only to the United States but also to the newly industrialised countries.\"     This could result in further major losses of market share, particularly in the non-OECD area, which accounts for almost a quarter of French exports, it said.     Until the competitive ability of industry improved, the authorities would have \"little scope for macroeconomic manoeuvre, even if the unemployment situation or the need to encourage a pickup in investment could require demand to grow more briskly,\" it added.     But rising unemployment could help to hold down wage demands, contributing to a slowdown in inflation to around a two pct annual rate this year and early next, the OECD said.     Written mainly in December last year, the report took no account of a rise in oil prices early in 1987, and a 0.9 pct surge in January consumer prices, caused partly by the government\'s deregulation of service sector tariffs.     \"We took a bet that the freeing of prices would not provoke runaway rises, and it is not absolutely certain that bet has been lost,\" one OECD official commented.     OECD officials said the January data and a rise in oil prices above the 15 dlrs a barrel average assumed in the report, indicated an upward revision in the inflation forecast to around 2.5 or three pct.     The government last week revised its forecast up to between 2.4 and 2.5 pct from two pct, against last year\'s 2.1 pct.     But the OECD backed the government\'s view that the underlying trend for inflation remained downwards this year, with a slowdown in domestic costs taking over from last year\'s fall in oil and commodity prices as the chief cause of disinflation.     With French unit productivity costs now among the lowest in the OECD area, the inflation differential between France and its main trading rival, West Germany, could fall to just one pct this year, it said.     On the other hand, the report noted, consumer prices for industrial goods and private services have been rising steeply as companies built up their profits.     \"For the disinflationary process to continue , and price competitiveness to become lastingly compatible with exchange rate stability, it is essential that wage restraint continue,\" it said.  \n',gnp
'France\'s Economic and Social Council (CES), an advisory body comprising industrialists, trade unionists and representatives of other sectors of the French economy, said the country\'s annual growth may not reach two pct in 1987.     French gross domestic product risks not reaching the two pct growth registered last year, the Council said in a report on first quarter 1987 economic activity without giving any specific forecasts. Finance Minister Edouard Balladur was quoted today as saying that French 1987 growth will probably be about two pct.     Balladur said in an interview with the financial daily Les Echos that the country\'s economic growth will probably be about the same as last year due to a less favourable international environment.     CES President Philippe Neeser said one of the major fears for the French economy this year was a resurge in inflation.     Disinflation was an absolute priority, Neeser told journalists, adding that a failure to do this would be extremely serious as if would be very difficult to reverse for many years.  \n',gnp
'French gross domestic product should grow by 2.3 pct in 1988 after two pct growth this year and 2.1 pct in 1986, the Finance Ministry said.     The latest forecast, prepared by the National Accounts and Budget Commission, assumed an exchange rate of 6.20 francs to the dollar this year and next and an average oil import price rising to 18.9 dlrs a barrel next year from 17.4 dlrs this year and 14.7 in 1986.     The Commission, headed by Finance minister Edouard Balladur, forecast a fall in consumer price inflation to two pct year-on-year at end-1988 from 2.4 pct at end 1987 and 2.1 pct last year.     In annual average terms inflation would fall to two pct in 1988 from 2.5 pct this year and 2.7 pct last year, it said.     Trade should show a one billion franc annual surplus this year and next after last year\'s 0.5 billion surplus, it added.     Employment should rise by 0.1 pct a year over the next two years while the state budget deficit should be cut to 2.2 pct of GDP in 1988 from 2.6 pct this year and 2.9 pct in 1986.     Other forecasts prepared by the Commission indicated a 1.8 pct 1988 rise in household purchasing power, up from 1.1 pct this year but less than last year\'s 2.9 pct, and a 1.6 pct rise in household consumption, compared with this year\'s 1.5 pct and last year\'s 2.9 pct.     Business investment is forecast to rise four pct a year this year and next after 3.7 pct last year, with private sector productive investment rising 4.9 pct in 1988 after a six pct rise this year and 5.5 pct in 1986.     The Ministry said updated forecasts would be prepared before the autumn to serve as the basis for the 1988 budget, which the government is now preparing for presentation in September.  \n',gnp
'French gross domestic product will grow by only 1.5 pct in real terms this year, compared with the government\'s forecast of two to 2.5 pct growth, the private Institut des Previsions Economiques et Financieres pour le Developpement des Entreprises (IPECODE) said.     However, it expects growth to recover next year to the 1986 level of two pct.     IPECODE said demand and production would develop in parallel this year, in contrast to last year when production was unable to keep pace with the strong rise in domestic demand, unleashing higher import demand.     Claims on the International Monetary Fund (IMF) rose by 298 mln francs to 19.61 billion francs, due to net withdrawals in francs by member nations, and an increase in reserves of Special Drawing Rights (SDRs) due mainly to the repayment of French debts.     Its deficit with the European Monetary Cooperation Fund (FECOM) remained unchanged in February at 33.90 billion francs.     French household consumption, which rose by 3.1 pct last year, is likely to grow by just 1.1 pct this year and 1.5 pct in 1988, it added.     Industrial investment is expected to rise by 4.3 pct this year and 5.5 pct in 1988, down from 6.5 pct in 1986.     Inflation, which was running at 2.1 pct at the end of 1986, is likely to rise to 2.9 pct at the end of this year, IPECODE said, while the government has forecast 2.5 pct.     However, the institute said inflation would fall back to 2.5 pct at the end of 1988, \"provided that real wage costs remain within the framework of productivity rises.\"  \n',gnp
'Senior officials in the West German coalition government said tax cuts planned for next year would be increased by 5.2 billion marks, in line with a pledge made by Finance Minister Gerhard Stoltenberg at last month\'s international monetary conference in Paris.     Gerold Tandler, General Secretary of the Christian Social Union Party, detailing the cuts at a news conference also attended by officials from the Christian Democratic Union and Free Democratic Party, said all of the additional 5.2 billion mark reduction would represent net tax relief.     An increase in revenue from other sources was not planned.     The reductions will be added on to a package of tax cuts already planned for 1988 amounting to some nine billion marks.     Tandler said three billion marks of the extra tax relief would be accounted for by reducing the rate of marginal increase in income tax.     An increase in personal tax allowances would save taxpayers 1.4 billion marks. Extra tax allowances for people whose children are being educated would cut 300 mln marks from the tax bill. A further 500 mln marks would be accounted for by increasing the level of special depreciations for small- and medium-sized companies.     The extra fiscal measures planned for next year are part of a general reform of the tax system which will come into effect in 1990. Stoltenberg had said in Paris that part of this reform, which will cut taxes by a gross 44 billion marks, would be introduced next year, ahead of schedule.     The West German government had come under pressure from the United States to stimulate its economy with tax cuts. But Stoltenberg said in a speech last night in Hamburg that, while the economy would continue to expand this year, the rate of growth was uncertain.     The government said in January it was aiming for real growth in Gross National Product this year of 2.5 pct, but some economists have revised their predictions down to two or below.     Stoltenberg said: \"We remain on a course of expansion. Whether (this will be) under two pct, as some people believe, or around 2.5 pct as some others expect, or even closer to three pct, as the Kiel World Economic Institute forecast a few days ago, remains open at the moment.\"  \n',gnp
'The economy will grow by an average rate of 2.2 pct a year in real terms between now and the end of 1991, Westdeutsche Landesbank Girozentrale (WestLB) said in an annual report.     A year ago WestLB had forecast average growth of just under three pct for 1986-1990.     The 1987 report said gross national product would only expand a real 1.7 pct this year -- below previous expectations -- because of weaker exports. Growth rates will pick up later, however, producing a 2.2 pct increase on average for the five-year period.  MORE \n',gnp
'Uncertainty is growing about the prospects for the economy as orders for industry fall and companies scale back investment plans, the German Savings Banks and Giro Association said.     Exporters expect foreign demand to remain weak, while industry is less optimistic than it was, the association said in a report.     However, last month\'s agreement among the six leading western industrialized countries to keep currencies around present levels was expected to be a stabilizing influence for exporters, it added.     The banking association said the possibility of using monetary policy to stimulate the economy should not be overestimated.     Another small drop in already low interest rates could not be expected to cause any significant rise in purchases of consumer or capital goods, it said.     The Bundesbank\'s half-point cuts in the discount and Lombard rates in January have largely exhausted the scope for any further monetary moves, the association added.     On Tuesday the Federal Statistics Office said gross national product stagnated in real, seasonally and calendar adjusted terms in the fourth quarter of 1986 compared with the third quarter.     The Economics Ministry, commenting on the figures, said GNP in the 1987 first quarter was also expected to be relatively weak.     Bank economists have forecast the economy will either stagnate or contract slightly in the first quarter. Official first-quarter figures are due in early June.  \n',gnp
'The outlook for the West German economy is relatively bright, with gross national product expected to expand by three pct this year, Kiel University\'s Institute for World Economy said.     The GNP forecast by the institute, one of five leading economic research bodies in West Germany, is more optimistic than that of the other institutes, some of which have recently reduced their GNP forecasts to between two and 2.5 pct.     In a report the Kiel institute said West Germany\'s export outlook has not deteriorated fundamentally despite the mark\'s strength against the dollar and other major currencies.     \"The danger that exports will slump in 1987 appears, all in all, limited,\" the report said. \"On the contrary, a slight rise in exports can be expected.\"     The institute said past experience has shown West German exporters will move to counterbalance currency factors by cutting costs, trying to penetrate new markets and adjusting their product ranges.     They will be aided in 1987 by an expected slight rise in economic growth in industrial countries. At the same time, the decline in exports to oil producing countries looks set to slow this year.     West German GNP growth in 1987 will be led by renewed advances in domestic consumption and investment spending, both of which will in turn be buoyed by an expansionary monetary policy, the institute said.     However, it said the labour market would see only a slight improvement because companies will be reluctant to hire additional workers due to higher labour costs caused partly by agreed reductions in working hours.     The institute cautioned that the expansionary stance of monetary policy in West Germany was likely to bring a marked acceleration of inflation.     It also warned that what it called the worldwide synchronization of monetary policy heightened the risk of a new global recession. It said central banks in industrialized countries, including the Bundesbank, had followed the Federal Reserve Board\'s expansionary course.     The institute said this in turn was bound to lead eventually to a rise in worldwide inflation and a shift in U.S. Policy towards a more restrictive policy. Other central banks were likely to follow suit, causing a recession that could aggravate the debt crisis of developing countries as well as increase protectionism around the world.     Although Germany cannot entirely shield itself from the negative effects of the global synchronization of monetary policy, it should do all it can to strengthen the forces of growth at home.     The institute said this could be done by ensuring that fiscal policy fosters a willingness to work and invest. Taxes should be cut by a greater amount than currently planned, and wage increases in 1987 and 1988 should be markedly lower than in 1986. It also said the Bundesbank should reduce inflationary pressures by cutting the current rate of growth in money supply to about four pct.  \n',gnp
'The DIW economic research institute said West German economic growth in 1987 is unlikely to reach the 1.5 pct rate it had forecast earlier this year.     The institute, whose forecasts are more pessimistic than those of the other four leading German institutes, said the economy had passed its peak in the summer of 1986, and its prospects had dimmed significantly since the autumn.     The DIW repeated earlier predictions that gross national product (GNP) in the first quarter of 1987 would contract in real, seasonally adjusted terms against the weak final quarter of last year.              \n',gnp
'Extracts from a report by Italy\'s Budget Ministry on the country\'s economic development in 1986 showed gross domestic product (GDP) 2.7 pct higher in real terms than in 1985 but a rise in unemployment.     GDP calculated at 1980 prices rose to 434,682 billion lire last year from 423,064 billion in 1985. On a current prices basis, GDP was up 11 pct, totalling 894,362 billion lire in 1986 against 805,754 billion in 1985.      But growth was insufficient to prevent a rise in unemployment to 11.1 pct last year from 10.3 pct in 1985, the ministry said.     The report said falling oil prices and the depreciation of the dollar during 1986 had favoured oil-importing countries such as Italy.     These factors helped Italy cut inflation to an average 6.3 pct in 1986, down from 9.3 pct in 1985.     They also helped a major improvement in the trade balance.     On the basis of data recently recalculated by the national statistics institute Istat, Italy had a trade deficit in 1986 of 3,722 billion lire, the report said. This slightly revises a previous deficit figure of 3,717 billion issued by Istat and compares with a negative balance of 23,085 billion for 1985.  \n',gnp
'Italy\'s gross domestic product (GDP) will grow three pct in real terms this year and 2.7 pct in 1988, said economic information company Data Resources Europe Inc (DRI).     Michel Girardin, DRI Europe\'s senior economist, said at a conference that Italian GDP growth this year \"will be mainly driven by consumption and especially investment.\"     Girardin said the driving force behind GDP growth next year will shift from domestic demand to exports as a result of expected depreciation of the lira against the major currencies.     Italy\'s budget ministry said yesterday that GDP rose 2.7 pct in real terms in 1986.     DRI forecast that inflation, which was an average 6.3 pct in 1986, will be under five pct this year and that interest rates should drop two pct.     Girardin said the lira is expected to appreciate 14 pct against the dollar this year following last year\'s 22 pct appreciation. An expected German mark appreciation against the dollar means that the lira should lose about six pct of its value relative to the German currency, he said.     DRI estimates that foreign demand for Italian products should grow by a 3.2 pct this year following last year\'s 6.2 pct increase.  \n',gnp
'The worst may be just about over for Japan\'s battered economy but economists said they do not expect a vigorous recovery anytime soon. Japanese bank economists polled bys said the economy\'s 18 month-old slowdown is likely to end in the first half of this year, helped by rising exports, stepped-up government spending and falling prices. \"The economy will bottom out in the middle of the year,\" said Sumitomo Bank Ltd chief economist, Masahiko Koido.     Industrial Bank of Japan Ltd senior economist Susumu Taketomi agreed. \"It (the bottom) is in the offing,\" he said.     But he added that the recovery will be slow. Growth in the fiscal year beginning next month will only pick-up 2.2 pct, from two pct in the current year, he said.     Signs that the economy has just about weathered the worst are increasing.     The volume of exports in the first two months of the year rose slightly on a year-on-year basis, after declining toward the end of last year.     Although this may be due to extraordinary factors such as a sharp rise in car exports to rebuild depleted European stocks, several economists said it could mark the beginning of a recovery.     Industrial production fell 0.7 pct in January, much smaller than expected, and is forecast by the government to rise 0.3 pct in February and 2.6 pct in March. A Bank of Japan survey released last week showed that the decline in Japanese corporate earnings may be nearing its end.     And the Paris currency accord last month has fostered hopes the rapid yen rise has come to the end, they said.     Six nations - the U.K., Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And West Germany - pledged in Paris last month to stabilise currencies around current levels.     The yen\'s 40 pct climb against the dollar over the last two years has hit the export-driven economy hard, by forcing its companies to raise prices and lose sales in the U.S. Market.     \"The important thing is the exchange rate,\" Taketomi said.     If it stabilises firms will grow more confident and raise investment in plant and equipment, although there are no signs of that yet, economists said.     A stable yen would also help exporters regain some of their competitive edge just as the U.S economy may be starting to recover, economists said.     Domestically, the economy may get a boost from some loosening of the government\'s tight fiscal policy said Haruo Muto, manager of national economics at the Bank of Tokyo Ltd.     The next reading of the economy\'s health should come early next week with the release of gnp figures for the last quarter, 1986.     Most private economists expect a rise of about 0.5 pct from the previous quarter. In the third quarter, GNP rose 0.6 pct.     But a senior government official said the fourth quarter figures could surprise by showing a rise of more than one point quarter-on-quarter. But he added that would be a statistical aberration and not a significant shift in economic activity.     To maintain year-on-year growth of around 2.5 pct, the economy would have had to rise about 1.2 pct in the fourth quarter as the final quarter of 1985 was strong.      The rise in the fourth quarter of 1985 was probably a statistical anomaly that was repeated in the final months of 1986, the official said.     Economists said the fourth quarter figures were also distorted by the government\'s sale of gold coins in the second half of 1986.     Because the coins were classified as legal tender, their purchase did not show up in the statistics on consumer expenditure. Consumer spending also tailed off in December because of bad weather and smaller-than-normal end-year bonuses, they said.     As the government had to buy back some of the coins from retailers because they were unsold, the government\'s contribution to the economy in the fourth quarter may have been boosted, economists said.     Taketomi said it may have received a further boost from government buying of farm products as the domestic crop last year was good.     The senior government official said the fourth quarter performance of the domestic sector was probably worse than generally expected, while that of the external sector was better.  \n',gnp
'The government will find it very difficult to achieve its new gross national product (GNP) forecast of three pct growth in the fiscal year ending March 31, Economic Planning Agency officials said.     They made the comment to reporters after news that GNP rose 0.8 pct in the October/December quarter, after a 0.7 pct increase the previous three months.     For Japan to achieve three pct growth in 1986/87, GNP in the January/March period would have to grow 2.6 pct from October/December, the officials said. The government lowered its GNP forecast for 1986/87 from four pct last December.  \n',gnp
'The Economic Planning Agency will announce gross national product (GNP) figures for the October/December quarter today at 1700 hrs local time (0800 gmt), Agency officials tolds.     In the July/September quarter, GNP rose 0.6 pct from the previous three months.  \n',gnp
'Japan\'s leading economic organisations urged the Government to prepare drastic pump-priming measures even at the cost of shelving Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone\'s planned tax reforms, officials involved said.     Officials of the Federation of Economic Organisations (Keidanren) said in a meeting with government officials the Government should issue construction bonds as an emergency measure to prop up the economy.     Keidanren suggested that proceeds from sales of stocks in the newly-privatised Nippon Telegraph and Telephone Corp should also be used to stimulate the economy.     Keidanren Chairman Eishiro Saito said the dollar\'s fall below 150 yen would create huge unemployment and bankruptcies that could shake the foundation of the Japanese economy.     The Keidanren meeting coincided with a written request for drastic reflationary measures sent to the Government by the Japan Chamber of Commerce and Industry.     Both organisations called for stepped-up Bank of Japan intervention to stabilise exchange rates.     Chamber head Noboru Gotoh told a press conference the awaited economic package should be powerful enough to push up Japan\'s Gross National Product (GNP) by about two pct.     Gotoh said the Government could cope with the present critical economic condition even if it put off its plan to stop the issue of deficit-covering bonds by fiscal 1990.     The plan to reduce the fiscal budget is a pillar of Nakasone\'s fiscal reconstruction program.   \n',gnp
'Kenya\'s economy will continue to expand this year and the government will do more to encourage investment by foreign firms and the local private sector, Planning Minister Robert Ouko said.     He told a news conference that the government would soon create a special bureau to expedite processing of investment applications by local and foreign investors.     Praising the role of multinational companies and local entrepreneurs in Kenya\'s economy, the minister promised to maintain a close working contact with the private sector.     The economy grew by 5.3 pct last year, up from 4.1 pct in 1985, Ouko said. This was owing to high prices for the country\'s coffee exports, low oil prices, low inflation and rising real incomes, he added.     \"Despite rising petroleum prices and falling coffee prices, Kenya\'s economy is still expected to improve in 1987,\" the planning minister said.     Agriculture would expand significantly if favourable weather continued and farmers responded to producer price rises announced in February, the minister added.     Kenyan farmers are anxiously awaiting the arrival of the long rainy season, which is due to start about now.     Ouko said the production of Kenya\'s main cash crops increased during the second half of last year.     Coffee deliveries to the state-run Coffee Board of Kenya rose 17 pct and tea deliveries rose four pct during the period, he said.  \n',gnp
'Malaysia\'s Central Bank, Bank Negara, said the economic outlook for 1987 is good in view of a marked improvement in commodity and oil prices in the later months of last year.     It said in its latest quarterly review that real gross domestic product averaged an annual growth of 1.1 pct over the first nine months of last year compared with a decline of 0.1 pct in the corresponding period in 1985.     Growth was generated mainly by the manufacturing sector, it added.  \n',gnp
'The Development Bank of Singapore Ltd (DBS) said Malaysia\'s real gross domestic product growth (gdp) in 1987 could be 1.5 to two pct, above a budget target of one pct.     It said in a report that because of an economic recovery and higher foreign exchange reserves, the Malaysian ringgit is unlikely to face devaluation in the near future.     The report was presented at a two-day investment conference organised by the DBS, one of Singapore\'s four major banks.     The report said rising commodity prices and the continued expansion of the manufacturing sector coupled with rigorous fiscal restraints and a more stable currency are grounds for cautious optimism about the Malaysian economy.     It forecast the ringgit will remain stable at between 2.60 and 2.70 Malaysian dlrs to the U.S. Dollar for the rest of the year.     But the report said the growth rate of Malaysia\'s external debt remains worrying and should be controlled. It said Malaysia\'s external debt totals 48 to 49 billion Malaysian dlrs and its debt service ratio exceeds 20 pct.  \n',gnp
'Gross domestic product (GDP) growth in 1987 is expected to grow by between 1.5 and two pct, up from one pct in 1986, the central bank said.     The forecast compares with the one pct GDP growth forecast made by the Treasury last October.     Bank Negara also said in its annual report that gross national product (GNP) is expected to grow by 3.5 to four pct, after declining 7.3 pct in 1986.     It said that a turnaround in investor confidence since last November had been spurred by a moderate improvement in oil and commodity prices and a rise in manufacturing exports.     Growth in 1987 is expected to come from the anticipated rise in export earnings if the industrialised countries sustain their average GNP growth at 2.5 to three pct, it added.     Bank Negara said its forecast assumes that crude oil will average 15.50 dlrs a barrel, rubber at 210 cents a kilo, palm oil at 850 ringgit a tonne, tin at 17 ringgit a kilo and a rise of 12 pct in manufacturing exports.     It said Malaysia\'s international terms of trade will turn around to rise by two pct in 1987 after declining 12 pct in 1986 and five pct in 1985.     \"In 1987, income will be higher, private consumer spending is likely to recover and expand... The budget will remain under strict control... The resource gap in the government\'s finances on current account will be bridged over the near term,\" Bank Governor Jaafar Hussein said in the report.     The current account deficit is expected to narrow to 1.19 billion ringgit in 1986 or 1.8 pct of GNP from 1.79 billion or 2.5 pct of the GNP the previous year.     The bank forecasts the inflation rate will increase by 1.5 pct, after its 0.7 pct rise in 1986.  \n',gnp
'The U.S. economy in March improved at a faster rate than in February, with the National Association of Purchasing Management\'s composite index rising to 53.9 pct from 51.9 pct, the NAPM said.     The first quarter average for the index also was 53.9 pct. The NAPM said that, if this average were to continue for the rest of 1987, it would be consistent with real gross national product growth of about three pct.     An index reading above 50 pct generally indicates that the economy is in an expanding phase. One below 50 pct implies a declining economy.     The NAPM said the economic improvement was evident in all of the indicators in the index except inventories, which declined slightly.     New orders rose sharply in March, with production also higher. Vendor deliveries slowed, another sign that the economy improved in March. Employment expanded for the first time since August 1984.     Robert Bretz, chairman of the NAPM\'s business survey committee and director of materials management at Pitney Bowes Inc PBI said \"the economy ended the first quarter with a healthy, if not substantial improvement.\"     Bretz said the sharp rise in the growth of new orders in March assures a good beginning for the second quarter.     Some 50 pct of the purchasing managers reported that they were paying higher prices in March than at the end of 1986. Of those paying higher prices now, the average increase was put at 2.5 pct.     The estimated average price increase anticipated by members for the remainder of 1987 is 2.1 pct. While prices continue to rise, the NAPM said that most purchasers do not see them as being significant.     The composite index is a seasonally adjusted figure, based on five components of the NAPM business survey - new orders, production, vendor deliveries, inventories and employment.     The monthly report is based on questions asked of purchasing managers at 250 U.S. industrial companies.  \n',gnp
'European Community finance ministers discussed the economic outlook for the 12-nation bloc and many said a recent gloomy forecast by the EC Commission was too pessimistic.     The Commission, the EC\'s executive authority, two weeks ago cut its forecast for economic growth in the Community to 2.3 per cent for this year from 2.8 per cent predicted last autumn.     It said economic prospects had been less promising over the past few months because of a sharp fall in the value of the dollar and a slowing of world trade -- factors which would restrain Community exports.     But diplomats said several member states, led by West Germany, Britain and France, felt the forecast was too gloomy, especially since it was drafted before a recent agreement between the leading Western economic powers to stabilise currencies around current levels.     \"Many delegations feel the (Commission\'s) report is rather too pessimistic,\" said Belgian Finance Minister Mark Eyskens, who chaired the meeting.     The Commission, which slashed its growth forecast for West Germany to two per cent from 3.2 per cent, has made clear it feels Bonn has room to introduce additional measures to stimulate its economy that would benefit the rest of Europe.     But two top German officials, State Secretaries Otto Schlecht and Hans Tietmeyer, told reporters Bonn saw no need at the moment for action to bolster the EC\'s biggest economy.     The diplomats said they were backed by Britain and France, while Italy, Greece and Denmark supported the Commission\'s view that Bonn should bring in new measures to aid EC growth. \n',gnp
'There is no question of stimulating consumption or relying on a systematic budget deficit or other reflationary policies to boost the French economy, sources close to finance minister Edouard Balladur said.     Their comments followed remarks by prime minister Jacques Chirac\'s spokesman Denis Baudouin, who said on Monday ministers were agreed on the desirability of \"relaunching\" the economy.     This sparked speculation the government was preparing for a reflationary U-turn, but the finance ministry immediately ruled out any such move.     The sources today said the government\'s policy remained one of \"recovery,\" or sound finances and greater efficiency.     They said that while 8.6 billion of the 30 billion franc revenues expected for 1987 from a sweeping privatisation program will go to providing public companies with fresh capital, 21.4 billion francs, or two-thirds, will go toward paying off national debt.     Any further privatisation revenue this year above the 30 billion would be distributed between repayment of national internal debt and public companies in similar proportions, they added.     The sources said it was absurd to talk of reflation when the country\'s internal debt, expected to grow by 10 pct this year from 1,300 billion francs in 1986 was growing twice as fast as gross domestic product.     Nominal GDP is expected to grow by roughly five pct this year from 5,000 billion francs last year, broadly in line with earlier forecasts. Real GDP will grow by up to 2.5 pct.     The sources said that with France\'s economic targets for 1987 roughly in line with its main trading partners, the government had no intention of pushing the economy to grow at an artificial pace out of step with neighbouring economies.  \n',gnp
'Australia faces a major medium term adjustment to reduce debt and improve its economic performance, the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development said in its latest annual review of the Australian economy.     It said Australia had a current external deficit of 5-3/4 pct of gross domestic product, high and rapidly rising external debt equal to 30 pct of GDP, growing servicing costs and inflation above nine pct, far higher than that of other OECD countries.     A major policy change in early 1985 helped lay the basis for sustained non-inflationary growth and external competitiveness had improved, but economic performance overall had sharply deteriorated since June 1985.     A major shift of real resources to the external sector -- about 4-1/2 pct of GDP by 1990-91 -- was required for the economy to expand in line with potential, for employment to grow, and for the debt/GDP ratio to stabilize, it said.     Success depended on the setting of right policies including tighter fiscal policy, a reduction in the public sector borrowing requirement and on private sector behaviour.     Looking ahead over the next 18 months, the OECD expected economic performance to improve, partly as a result of tighter fiscal and monetary policy, and a substantial improvement in trade volumes.     It said positive GDP growth of three pct might be restored, the current external deficit could fall to some 4-1/2 pct of GDP by the first half of next year, while inflation was projected to decelerate to around five to 5-1/2 pct by mid-1988.     Continued real wage moderation was essential to maintain the competitive edge created by the Australian dollar\'s depreciation, and to maintain if not boost profit shares in order to encourage business investment.     The report urged Australia to broaden its export base by developing viable and competitive service and manufacturing industries, and not count on a recovery of commodity markets to correct its external imbalances.     It added Australia should reduce protection levels in manufacturing, even though faster trade liberalisation would no doubt hurt the most protected sectors of industry.  \n',gnp
'President Alan Garcia said he sought to deepen Peru\'s hard-line foreign debt stance, possibly by limiting repayments to the World Bank.     In a televised address tonight, he criticised the World Bank for making Peru make larger debt payments than the amount the bank is willing to make in new loans. \"We will deepen our policy on the foreign debt,\" he said.     Peru has limited foreign debt repayments to 10 pct of export earnings, effectively suspending most remittances due foreign private banks and many governments. It has generally been current for most of Garcia\'s 20 months in office on payments to the World Bank and the Inter-American Development Bank.     But tonight Garcia said: \"We have met our aim of limiting the payment of the debt and will limit it also even though organisations like the World Bank have credits which oblige us to buy a certain type of machinery and to build certain types of public works and not others, and to pay much more in dollars than that which they are willing to newly lend us.\"     The Economy Ministry said last year it owed the World Bank about 520 mln dlrs in loans out of the country\'s 14 billion dlr debt.     Garcia said his government had been a model for Latin America because Peru had enjoyed growth in gross domestic product (GDP) last year of nine pct while taking its hard line on debt. He said GDP would grow by at least six pct this year.     He announced an immediate 40 pct rise in the minimum wage to 1,260 intis per month, benefiting the 1.3 mln minimum-wage workers out of a total labour force of 6.7 mln.     Salaries will go up this month by 30 pct for civil servants and 27 pct for those workers earning above the minimum wage but not covered by collective bargaining agreements.     He also said the price of petrol, frozen since August 1, 1985, would increase by 20 pct from the current 17.5 intis per U.S. Gallon and remain at the new level for the rest of the year. He did not say when this increase would be effective.     Taxes on petrol are the government\'s leading revenue earner, traditionally accounting for about one-third of taxes. Sales taxes on autos, liquour and cigarettes would also go up, he said, without specifying the amount.     Garcia announced the government would encourage Peruvians to repatriate their savings deposited abroad by paying a 15 pct premium above the market exchange rate.     The inti\'s official buy-sell rate against the dollar is 14.85/92 and the free rate is about 21.70/80.     To encourage private investment, he said the government would set up a special fund with which it would match every two intis of private investment with one inti from the government.     He also said his dismissal of Peruvian Air Force Commander Lieutenant General Luis Abram Cavarellino yesterday strengthened the democratic authority of his government.  \n',gnp
'Portugal\'s Gross Domestic Product (GDP) will grow around four pct this year, the same rate as in 1986, according to a Bank of Portugal forecast.     Total investment this year, the country\'s second as a member of the European Community (EC), will rise nearly 10 pct, again the same rate as last year, the central bank study said.     It added that Portugal\'s current account was forecast to show a surplus of 400 mln dlrs this year compared with 1.13 billion in 1986 and 369 mln the previous year.     Last year\'s high surplus was attributed to cheaper oil and raw materials, lower world interest rates and a weaker dollar.     Imports by volume were forecast to grow 10 pct this year and exports four pct compared with increases of 16.5 pct and 6.6 pct respectively in 1986, the bank said.     The forecasts were calculated on the assumption that the non-expansionary monetary policy carried out by the current government would be maintained, particularly in budget spending and income and in wage policy.     The bank added that the 1987 forecasts were also based on the assumption that the international economic situation and Portugal\'s world trade relations would remain more or less the same as in 1986.     The central bank said the high rate of investment estimated for 1986 was due to government policies and to increasing optimism among firms whose financial situation had improved since 1985. This tendency was expected to continue this year, especially in the construction and public works sectors.     Financial aid from the EC had also helped to boost investment last year, the bank said.  \n',gnp
'President Reagan said the 1.1 pct U.S. economic growth rate during the final quarter of 1986 \"wasn\'t all that bad.\"     The Commerce Department said the rate of growth of the Gross National Product in the October-December period was only slightly less than a preliminary estimate of 1.3 pct made earlier.     At the same time, it said inflation, as measured by the GNP price deflator, rose by 0.7 pct during the period.     Asked his reaction to the GNP report during a White House photo session, Reagan replied, \"It wasn\'t all that bad.\"  \n',gnp
'Singapore\'s gross domestic product will grow six pct in the first quarter and five pct in the second quarter this year, with further growth expected in the second half, Trade and Industry Minister Lee Hsien Loong told parliament.     The figures compared with 3.4 pct contraction and 1.2 pct growth respectively for the first and second quarters of 1986.     The estimates were based on a tentative leading indicator incorporating new business orders, company inventories and share prices used by his ministry, Lee said, without giving further details of the new indicator.     Singapore\'s economy grew 1.9 pct last year, after shrinking 1.8 pct in 1985. The government has forecast growth rate of three to four pct for 1987.  \n',gnp
'The South African Reserve Bank, confirming previous estimates, said real gross domestic product in the 1986 fourth quarter grew at a seasonally adjusted annual rate of 4.7 pct versus 4.6 pct in the third quarter and 1.3 pct in the 1985 final quarter.     The bank, in its latest quarterly review, said the nominal growth rate for the year did not quite reach one pct after a 1.5 pct contraction in 1985.     But it said when the strengthening of the terms of trade is taken into account, the real GNP in 1986 advanced by 1.5 pct compared with a decrease of 0.5 pct in 1985.     GDP is the total value of goods and services produced by an economy but omits income from abroad.  GNP includes such payments or outflows.     The bank also said there were indications the country\'s economic recovery was becoming more broadly based.     With the exception of commerce all major sectors of the economy contributed to the fourth quarter rise in domestic production.     The bank said major increases in foreign reserves were recorded in January, February and the first half of March 1987. Reserves rose by 1.70 billion rand during January and February.     Total reserves in 1986 declined by 189 mln rand to 5.70 billion rand and were equivalent to about 14.5 pct of the total annual value of import payments.     The current account surplus amounted to 7.20 billion rand in 1986 versus 5.90 mln the previous year.     The bank said continuing strength of the current account has allowed foreign reserves to be \"rebuilt to more comfortable levels.\"     \"This has strengthened the authorities\' hands in lending support to the exchange rate of the rand if such action were to be called for,\" the bank said.  \n',gnp
'South Korea plans to increase the size of its budget in 1988 by 11 to 12 pct from this year\'s 15,596 billion won, Economic Planning Board officials said.     The proposed boost is based on a government forecast that gross national product (gnp) will grow by more than 7.5 pct and the gnp deflator by 3.5 pct in 1988, against targets of 8.0 pct and 3.5 pct respectively this year, they said.     Details of the 1988 budget, in which spending will match revenue, have yet to be worked out, the officials said.     The balanced budget in 1986 totalled 13,800.5 billion won.  \n',gnp
'South Korea\'s gross national product (gnp) is forecast to grow by nine pct in 1987, surpassing the government\'s original forecast of eight pct and against a 12.5 pct rise in 1986, an Economic Planning Board report said.     The report reviewing the country\'s economy in the first three months of this year said year-on-year gnp was provisionally estimated to have grown by about 12 pct in the period, against a 10.5 pct growth in the same 1986 period.     Board officials said the gnp rise in the January-March period is due largely to increased exports, which totalled 9.34 billion dlrs against 6.9 billion a year earlier.  \n',gnp
'Spain has revised some of its main economic targets for 1987 after studying the performance of the economy in the first quarter, the economy ministry said in its monthly bulletin.     Internal demand is now forecast to rise four pct against a previous target of 3.5 pct.     Mariano Rubio, governor of the Bank of Spain, the central bank, yesterday said internal demand was currently growing at an annual rate of six pct and it had to be brought down to four pct if the government were to meet its five pct inflation target this year. Inflation was 8.3 pct in 1986.     The forecast for private consumption growth remains unchanged at three pct, although public consumption is revised upwards to 2.5 pct from 2.0 pct.     Growth in domestic demand will fuel imports, expected to increase by 8.6 pct against an originally estimated 7.1 pct.     Export growth has been revised downwards to 3.7 pct from 5.2 pct due to the peseta\'s continuing strength against the dollar and slack external demand.     Slow growth of exports and a tight rein on state spending has lowered estimated GDP growth to three pct in 1987 from an earlier forecast 3.5 pct. GDP grew by three pct last year.     The economy ministry is holding its inflation forecast to five pct, in spite of minister Carlos Solchaga\'s doubts last week on whether this target could be maintained if wage settlements continue to rise above the government\'s recommended five pct ceiling.     Unions and employers dispute the average wage increases agreed so far this year. Trade unions calculate wage settlements have produced average rises of 7.3 pct against 5.5 pct estimated by the employers\' federation CEOE.  \n',gnp
'Sweden\'s Gross National Product rose 1.3 pct last year against 2.3 pct in 1985, mainly due to a lower than forecast growth in exports and a sharp fall in total investments, the Central Bureau of Statistics reported.     Private consumption rose 4.1 pct during 1986 against 2.7 pct in 1985 whereas the Finance Ministry had expected an increase of only 3.6 pct. Total investments fell 0.7 pct against a rise of 6.3 pct in 1985. The Finance Ministry had forecast a rise of 0.3 pct in 1986.     Exports rose 2.1 pct last year against 2.3 pct in 1985, but the Finance Ministry had predicted a growth of 2.8 pct.  \n',gnp
'Turkey\'s Gross National Product grew an estimated 8.0 pct in 1986 at fixed 1968 prices, compared with 5.1 pct in 1985, the State Statistics Institute said.     Reporting full-year data, it also said Gross Domestic Product rose 8.3 pct compared with 5.1 pct in 1985. An earlier estimate from nine-month data put full-year GNP and GDP growth both at 7.9 pct.     The government\'s GNP growth target for 1987 is five pct, the same level it had set for 1986.     The institute estimated per capita GNP for 1986 at 1,116.6 dlrs, up from 1,045.3 dlrs in 1985.     Officials blame the high 1986 GNP growth on a surge in domestic demand stemming partly from poorly controlled municipal expenditures in the early part of the year.     Industry grew at 11.1 pct in real terms in 1986 compared with 6.6 pct in 1985 while agriculture expanded 7.4 pct compared with 2.8 pct.  \n',gnp
'Britain\'s gross domestic product (GDP) on the average basis of output, expenditure and income rose by 2.6 pct in 1986 after a 3.4 pct increase a year earlier, Central Statistical Office (CSO) preliminary figures show.     In the fourth quarter, GDP rose 0.7 pct over the previous quarter and was up 3.3 pct on the same 1985 quarter.     The average estimate index, seasonally-adjusted and based 1980, was set at 114.3 in the fourth quarter of 1986 against 113.5 in the previous quarter and 110.7 in the final quarter of 1985.     The CSO said the average GDP estimate index for 1986 as a whole was 113.1, up 2.6 pct from 110.2 for 1985.     On the output measure, GDP rose an upward revised seasonally adjusted 0.3 pct in the fourth quarter of 1986 to 114.9 on the output index from 114.5 in the previous quarter, giving a 3.2 pct rise over the fourth 1985 quarter, the CSO figures show.     On income-based GDP, the index in the fourth quarter rose by 0.7 pct from the third quarter and was up 3.8 pct on the year-ago quarter.     The indices stood at 115.3, 114.4 and 111.0 respectively.     Expenditure-based GDP rose 1.2 pct in the fourth quarter of 1986 from the third quarter and was up 2.9 pct from the same 1985 quarter.     The CSO set the expenditure index at 112.9 from 111.6 in the third quarter of 1986 and 109.8 in the final 1985 quarter.     The year-on-year rise for expenditure GDP was 2.3 pct with the expenditure index for the whole of 1986 set at 111.9 against 109.4 a year earlier.     For income GDP, the year-on-year rise was 2.6 pct against against three pct a year earlier. The ouptut GDP measure rose 2.8 pct year-on-year, down from 3.8 pct in 1985.     The government usually considers the output measure the most reliable way of measuring short-term GDP changes.     It is based on output data for production industry and partial information for the rest of the economy.     The government had forecast that average measure GDP would rise 2.5 pct in calendar 1986 after 3.3 pct in 1985. The budget unveiled on Tuesday foresaw GDP growth in 1987 of three pct.     The GDP deflator, based on expenditure at market prices, rose 1.2 pct in the fourth quarter from the third, to give a 2.4 pct rise over fourth quarter 1985. Year-on-year, the deflator rose 3.7 pct.  \n',gnp
'Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson, presenting his budget for fiscal 1987/88 to Parliament, said U.K. Economic growth was forecast at three pct in calendar 1987.     He said the Treasury expected a current account balance of payments deficit in 1987 of 2.5 billion stg, after a 1.1 billion shortfall in 1986.     Inflation is expected to be 4.0 pct at the end of this year, Lawson said.     \"As I forecast in the Autumn Statement, inflation may continue to edge up for a time, perhaps exceeding 4.5 pct by the summer, before falling back to 4.0 pct by the end of the year,\" he added.     Turning to the Public Sector Borrowing Requirement (PSBR), Lawson said the likely outturn for fiscal 1986/87 was 4.0 billion stg, or 1.0 pct of GDP.     The planned PSBR for 1987/88 was set at 4.0 billion stg.     On monetary policy, Lawson confirmed the target range for the narrow M0 measure would be two to six pct in fiscal 1987/88.     No explicit target was set for the broad sterling M3 aggregate, he said. \"But broad money will continue to be taken into account in assessing monetary conditions, as of course will the exchange rate,\" the Chancellor told Parliament.     Lawson said the low outturn of the PSBR in 1986/87 \"is chiefly attributable to the remarkable buoyancy of non-oil tax revenues in general, and the corporation tax paid by an increasingly profitable business sector in particular.\"     On oil prices, Lawson said he was sticking to his earlier assumption that North Sea crude prices will average 15 dlrs per barrel in calendar 1987.     He said \"it is clear that the increased flow of non-oil tax revenues, coupled with the prospective further growth of the economy in excess of the growth of public expenditure, puts the public finances in a very strong position.\"     Lawson said the Treasury would strive to keep the PSBR at 1.0 pct of GDP in future.     \"We have reached what I judge to be the (Medium Term Financial Strategy\'s) appropriate destination - a PSBR of 1.0 pct of GDP. My aim will be to keep it there over the years ahead,\" Lawson said.     \"Inevitably, this greatly diminishes the scope I have this year for reducing the burden of taxation, which of course remains a major objective of government policy.\"     \"But I am sure it is right to err on the side of prudence and caution, and to build a still firmer base for the future.\"     Lawson said the time had come to strike the Exchange Control Act from the Statute book.     On corporation tax, he said the rate will remain unchanged at 35 pct in 1987/88. But companies\' capital gains will be charged at the \"appropriate corporation tax rate.\"     He said that under the new proposed system, companies should be able to set Advanced Capital Tax (ACT) payments against tax on capital gains.     \"Taken together, these changes should yield 60 mln stg in 1988/89,\" Lawson said.     Lawson said he will propose that all companies and building societies be treated the same way on payment of corporation tax, \"with all liable to pay corporation tax nine months after the end of the accounting period on which the tax is due.\"     \"I also propose to legislate now to pave the way for a new method of collecting corporation tax, to be known as Pay and File.\"     This would be part of a wider programme of streamlining tax collection, and would not come into force until the early 1990s.     Lawson said he planned two reliefs on Petroleum Revenue Tax (PRT). As from today, companies may elect to have up to 10 pct of the costs of developing certain new fields set against their (PRT) liabilities in existing fields, until the income of those new fields exceeds the costs incurred.     Second, there will be a new relief against PRT for spending on research into U.K. Oil extraction that is not related to any particular field.     On business employment, Lawson said employers will receive tax relief for retraining workers.     Lawson said that in future, traders registered for Value Added Tax (VAT) would be able to choose to account for the tax on the basis of cash paid and received.     Small businesses may account for VAT annually instead of quarterly. The VAT compulsory registration period was being extended to 30 days, he added, and VAT registration thresholds are to be raised to 21,300 stg.     New measures are planned to combat VAT avoidance, he added.     The capital gains tax retirement relief limit would now be set at 125,000 stg.     Lawson said he proposed to change the law so that companies in multinational groups with dual residence will no longer be able to secure tax relief twice on the same interest payment. The change will take effect on April 1, 1987, but \"genuine trading companies\" will not be affected.     He also planned to end the present treatment of tax credit relief for foreign withholding tax paid on interest on bank loans, also from April 1.     \"In future, banks will be able to offset this tax credit only against tax on the profit on the relevant loan,\" he said.     The standard rate of taxation is being reduced by two pence, to 27 pct from 29 pct.     Lawson reiterated the government\'s aim of reducing basic taxation to 25 pence in the pound, but added \"given my decision to use the greater part of the fiscal scope I now have to reduce the PSBR, that goal cannot be achieved in this budget.\"     Small companies\' corporation tax is also being reduced to 27 pct, he said.     On the Lloyd\'s insurance market, Lawson said he planned to change the tax treatment of Lloyd\'s syndicates, bringing it into line with that of provisions for outstanding liabilities made by ordinary insurance companies and of comparable provisions made by financial traders.     The Inland Revenue would be told to consult urgently with Lloyd\'s about the details of the legislation, he said.     \"The new rules will first apply to premiums payable for the Lloyd\'s account which closes on December 31 this year,\" Lawson said.  MORE \n',gnp
'Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson, presenting his budget for fiscal 1987/88 to parliament, said U.K. Economic growth was forecast at three pct in calendar 1987.     He said the Treasury expected a current account balance of payments deficit in 1987 of 2.5 billion stg, after a 1.1 billion shortfall in 1986. Inflation is expected to be 4.0 pct at the end of 1987, he said, adding it may exceed 4.5 pct by the summer before falling back to 4.0 pct by the end of the year.     The planned PSBR for 1987/88 was 4.0 billion stg unchanged when compared with the likely outturn for fiscal 1986/87, Lawson said.     Although no explicit target was set for the broad sterling M3 money supply, Lawson said broad money will continue to be taken into account in assessing monetary conditions as well as the exchange rate.     The low outturn of the PSBR in 1986/87 was mainly due to the buoyancy of non-oil tax revenues in general, and the corporation tax paid by an increasingly profitable business sector in particular.     On oil prices, Lawson said he was sticking to his earlier assumption that North Sea crude prices will average 15 dlrs per barrel in calendar 1987. The treasury would strive to keep the PSBR at 1.0 pct of GDP in future, he said.  \n',gnp
'Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige said a 0.7 pct rise in February\'s index of leading indicators pointed to stronger economic growth in the first half of 1987.     In a statement commenting on the rise last month after a 0.5 pct January decline, Baldrige noted the leading index was rising at an 8.0 pct annual rate in the six months to the end of February.     \"Based on past relationships, that gain is consistent with stepped up growth in real GNP during the first half of 1987,\" Baldrige said.  \n',gnp
'Senior U.S. Economic officials disagree on the likelihood the government can meet its budget deficit reduction targets.     Beryl Sprinkel, chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers, reiterated the Reagan Administration\'s opposition to a tax increase and its pledge to reduce the deficit by cutting spending and fostering economic growth.     By contrast, Rudolph Penner, Director of the Congressional Budget Office, said the budget process has broken down and the deficit will remain close to 200 billion dlrs for fiscal 1987.     Sprinkel told a symposium sponsored by New York University that spending could be cut by avoiding decisions based on the desire to influence votes and by shifting the responsibility for local projects to state governments.     He also suggested a line-item veto, which allows the President to veto parts of bill without rejecting all of it, to limit wasteful spending. Spending and taxing decisions should be linked more closely.     Sprinkel said the Administration still looks for 2.7 pct growth in U.S. Real gross national product (GNP) in 1987 and 3.5 pct in 1988.     Asked if the latest economic reports signal this rate of economic growth is attainable, Sprinkel said, \"It looks pretty good to me. We\'ve had two very strong employment reports.\"     He also said federal reserve policy is appropriate, adding, \"It looks like they\'re on track.\"     While further reductions are needed in the trade deficit, Sprinkel said the lower dollar is having an impact.     The new 1987 tax laws will not hurt the economy and the tax reform act of 1986 significantly lowers tax rates and will greatly increase private production incentives, he said.     \"Our estimates at the Council of Economic Advisers suggest national net output of goods and services will permanently increase by approximately two pct because of the long-run consequences of tax reform,\" Sprinkel said. \"In 1986, this would have amounted to an increase of approximately 600 dlrs in the income of the average American family.\"     Sprinkel also argued the 1981 tax cuts were not responsible for the large increase in the budget deficit.     In fiscal 1986 ending September, federal spending amounted to 23.8 pct of GNP, while federal receipts absorbed 18.5 pct of GNP, leaving a deficit of 5.3 pct, he said.     Sprinkel said that, compared with fiscal 1978, the 1986 federal expenditure share of GNP is 2.7 percentage points higher and the revenue share of GNP is virtually the same.     \"Contrary to the conventional wisdom, therefore, the 1981 tax cut is not the root cause of the extraordinary budget deficits of the past few years,\" Sprinkel said.     \"This tax cut merely rolled back the inflation-induced tax increases that occurred between 1978 and 1981,\" he added.     However, the Congressional Budget Office\'s Rudolph Penner argued that the tax cut in 1981 was misguided.     \"Since making the big mistake in 1981 of cutting taxes enormously without any plan to decrease spending by the Administration or Congress, indeed with increases in defence spending, now all the options (for reducing the budget deficit) are unpleasant,\" he said.     Penner said the tax cut resulted from the ideological turmoil in the U.S. Caused by the \"biggest sustained inflation in our nation\'s history,\" which helped foster widespread distrust of government.     \"The American people turned on the government with tax revolt at the state level and new demands on the government at the national level,\" Penner said.     \"But their dislike of taxes exceeded their general dislike of spending programs. Now the correction of that 1981 mistake demands that the system change a lot.\"     Penner sees little hope the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings budget deficit reduction targets will be met and said the deficit will remain at roughly 200 billion dlrs this year.     He said a budget process that sets targets arbitrarily is not likely to succeed.     \"I feel pretty safe in saying that any process that tries to dictate a numerical outcome from above is doomed to fail simply because there\'s no ... Way to enforce it,\" Penner said.     Penner questioned the methods by which the 1987 budget deficit was cut. He said 18 to 19 billion dlrs were eliminated by one-time measures, such as a temporary increase in taxes related to tax reform and sales of government assets.     \"Another four billion dlrs was cut by what I call creative timing changes, like moving the military payday from the last day of fiscal 1987 to the first day of fiscal 1988. That saved more than two billion dlrs,\" Penner said.  \n',gnp
'The U.S. Gross National Product, after removing the impact of inflation, increased at a revised annual rate of 1.1 pct in the fourth quarter, the Commerce Department said.     That was down from an earlier preliminary 1.3 pct rise estimated a month ago and down from the 2.1 pct rise in the fourth quarter of 1985.     The final fourth quarter revision, however, left unchanged the previous estimate of a 2.5 pct increase in GNP for all of 1986 over 1985.     The revised estimate for fourth quarter GNP partly reflected a downward revision in inventories to a total decrease of 28.5 billion dlrs in the fourth quarter, the department said.     The revisions also indicated personal consumption spending decreased 2.2 billion dlrs in the fourth quarter after an increase of 39.6 billion dlrs in the third quarter.     Exports of goods and services rose 15.3 billion dlrs after a decline of 9.4 billion dlrs in the third quarter. Imports decreased 700 mln dlrs in the final quarter, in contrast to an increase of 20.9 billion dlrs in the third quarter.  \n',gnp
'president jaime lusinchi defended the 20.3 billion dlr debt rescheduling accord his government recently signed, saying it will open new credit flows and bring needed foreign investment to venezuela.     In his annual state of the nation speech, lusinchi also said venezuela supports other latin american debtors, despite having reached a rescheduling accord on its own.     In the 90-minute speech to the congress, lusinchi summed up the achievements of his administration, which took office in february 1984. He pointed to the 3.3 pct growth in non-oil gdp in 1986 and to a \"moderate\" 12 pct inflation rate.     Lusinchi said the 20.3 billion dlr debt rescheduling signed feb. 27 put an end to a process which had been \'the calvary of our nation over the post four years.\'     In the refinancing accord, he said, venezuela managed to achieve \'the most inmportant thing, which is the reopening of financial flows from abroad, essential for the financing of development and the (financing) of trade and investment.\'     Once all the details of the agreement are finalized, he said, venezuela will seek new financing for the imported components of new development projects.     \"our intention is not to continue being net exporters of capital, but to protect our balance of payments with a flow of capital towards venezuela,\" he said.     Under the agreement signed february 27, venezuela extended payments on the debt from 12 to 14 years, while the interest rate was lowered from 1 y 1/8 to 7/8 of a pct over libor.     At the same time, payments over the next three years were lowered from 3.450 to 1.350 billion dlrs.     Lusinchi defended the rescheduling accord against critics who said it merely deferred the weight of payments to future governments.  \n',gnp
'A confidential World Bank report on the Peruvian economy has said the government\'s strategy does not offer good prospects for medium and long-term growth and is likely to lead to an early renewal of inflationary pressure.     The report, published today by the economic monthly, The Peru Report, said the success of president Alan Garcia\'s government in stimulating output last year to achieve a growth in gross domestic product of over eight pct \"represents gains in the short term at the expense of the long.\"     Government officials had no immediate comment on the report, which advised a reduction in the overall size of the public investment program and greater emphasis on the preservation of Peru\'s export potential.     The report said that although the government had succeeded in cutting inflation from 250 pct a year in the first half of 1985 to under 70 pct, its stabilisation and reactivation program was encountering rising difficulties.     \"An early renewal of inflationary pressures, linked to monetary expansion, exchange rate devaluation and an easing of price controls, appears not improbable,\" it added.     The world bank report said the government\'s policies had reduced inflation and short-term increases in consumption at the apparent cost of price distortions, overvaluation of the currency, balance of payments disequilibrium, reserve losses, and sharply diminished creditworthiness.     It said unless the government took action quickly to fix a competitive exchange rate and control the public sector deficit, \"the higher the probability will be that the government will eventually have to resort to drastic curtailment of domestic demand and either sharp devaluation or still further controls on imports in order to stem inflation and support the balance of payments.\"     It said the bank would place more emphasis on the preservation of peru\'s export potential, external links and overall economic efficiency.     The government\'s incentive policies towards the mining and petroleum sectors, among its main traditional exports, suggested that it did not accord high priority to their economic viability, it added.  \n',gnp
'Zimbabwe\'s real gross domestic product increased 0.2 pct in 1986, according to preliminary figures published by the Central Statistical Office (CSO). This contrasts with a rise of more than nine pct in 1985.     The main reason for the slower rate of economic growth was a drop in the real value of agricultural output. This declined 12 pct in 1986 following a 24 pct improvement the previous year. Mining output fell one pct in 1986 but manufacturing production increased 1.4 pct.     The CSO said that at current prices GDP rose 12.7 pct to 8.2 billion Zimbabwe dlrs, but inflation, measured by the GDP deflator, was estimated at 12.2 pct, so there was virtually no growth in real output during 1986.  \n',gnp